Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.140

Purchase of certain shares of stock by directors, officers, and employees permitted—Conditions.

Directors, officers, and employees of the converting savings bank, as part of the subscription offering, may be entitled to purchase shares of capital stock, to the extent that shares are available after satisfying the subscriptions of eligible account holders and supplemental eligible account holders, subject to the following conditions:

(1) The total number of shares which may be purchased under this section shall not exceed twenty-five percent of the total number of shares to be issued in the case of a converting savings bank with total assets of less than fifty million dollars or fifteen percent in the case of a converting savings bank with total assets of five hundred million dollars or more; in the case of a converting savings bank with total assets of fifty million dollars or more but less than five hundred million dollars, the percentage shall be no more than a correspondingly appropriate number of shares based on total asset size (for example, twenty percent in the case of a converting savings bank with total assets of approximately two hundred seventy five million dollars); and

(2) The shares shall be allocated among directors, officers, and employees on an equitable basis such as by giving weight to period of service, compensation, and position, subject to a reasonable limitation on the amount of shares which may be purchased by any person or associate thereof, or group of affiliated persons or group of persons otherwise acting in concert.

[ 1981 c 85 s 27.]